Utah statutes.
63B-1a-402.   Legal investment status.

Bonds issued under this chapter are legal investments for all state trust funds, insurance companies, banks, trust companies, and the State School Fund and may be used as collateral to secure legal obligations.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 2003 General Session

